Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SPECIAL LIQUOR LAW; CITY OF ROCHESTER.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any other law, ordinance, or charter provision to the contrary, the city of Rochester may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license to the Historic Chateau Theater, located in the city at 15 1st Street Southwest. The license authorizes sales on all days of the week to persons attending performances, exhibitions, or any other events at the theater. The provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 340A, not inconsistent with this section, apply to a license issued under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the Rochester City Council and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. new text end